Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-3503
Legislative intent; county powers and duties.

(1) It is the intent of the Legislature to encourage counties to develop a continuum of alternatives to detention for the purpose of enhancing, developing, and expanding the availability of such services to juveniles requiring alternatives to detention.

(2) A county may enhance, develop, or expand alternatives to detention as needed with private or public providers. Grants from the Commission Grant Program and aid from the Community-based Juvenile Services Aid Program under the Juvenile Services Act and the federal Juvenile Justice and Delinquency Prevention Act of 1974 may be used to fund alternatives to detention. Each county shall routinely review services provided by contract providers and modify services as needed.

Laws 2000, LB 1167, § 3;

Laws 2001, LB 640, § 13;

Laws 2013, LB561, § 52;

Laws 2016, LB894, § 18.

Juvenile Services Act, see section 43-2401.